Nevada, session 83, AB544.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 449.089 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.089 1. Each license issued pursuant to NRS 449.029 to
449.2428, inclusive, expires 1 year after the date on [December 31
following its issuance and is renewable for 1 year] which it was
issued. Such a license may be renewed annually upon reapplication
and payment of all fees required pursuant to subsection 4 and NRS
449.050, as applicable, unless the Division finds, after an
investigation, that the facility has not:
(a) Satisfactorily complied with the provisions of NRS 449.029
to 449.2428, inclusive, or the standards and regulations adopted by
the Board;
(b) Obtained the approval of the Director of the Department of
Health and Human Services before undertaking a project, if such
approval is required by NRS 439A.100 or 439A.102; or
(c) Conformed to all applicable local zoning regulations.
2. Each reapplication for an agency to provide personal care
services in the home, an agency to provide nursing in the home, a
community health worker pool, a facility for intermediate care, a
facility for skilled nursing, a provider of community-based living
arrangement services, a hospital described in 42 U.S.C. §
1395ww(d)(1)(B)(iv), a psychiatric hospital that provides inpatient
services to children, a psychiatric residential treatment facility, a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
residential facility for groups, a program of hospice care, a home for
individual residential care, a facility for the care of adults during the
day, a facility for hospice care, a nursing pool, the distinct part of a
hospital which meets the requirements of a skilled nursing facility or
nursing facility pursuant to 42 C.F.R. § 483.5, a hospital that
provides swing-bed services as described in 42 C.F.R. § 482.58 or,
if residential services are provided to children, a medical facility or
facility for the treatment of alcohol or other substance use disorders
must include, without limitation, a statement that the facility,
hospital, agency, program, pool or home is in compliance with the
provisions of NRS 449.115 to 449.125, inclusive, and 449.174.
3. Each reapplication for an agency to provide personal care
services in the home, a community health worker pool, a facility for
intermediate care, a facility for skilled nursing, a facility for the care
of adults during the day, a residential facility for groups or a home
for individual residential care must include, without limitation, a
statement that the holder of the license to operate, and the
administrator or other person in charge and employees of, the
facility, agency, pool or home are in compliance with the provisions
of NRS 449.093.
4. Each reapplication for a surgical center for ambulatory
patients, facility for the treatment of irreversible renal disease,
facility for hospice care, program of hospice care, hospital, facility
for intermediate care, facility for skilled nursing, agency to provide
personal care services in the home or rural clinic must be
accompanied by the fee prescribed by the State Board of Health
pursuant to NRS 457.240, in addition to the fees imposed pursuant
to NRS 449.050.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on January 1, 2026.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)